Montana, session 2025, HB327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Legislature may refund excess revenue. (1) The legislature may enact
a program to provide income tax refunds for resident taxpayers when the state has excess revenue.
(2) If enacting income tax refunds for resident taxpayers, the legislature may consider:
(a) the amount of revenue that triggers the refunds;
(b) how to calculate the refund amount;
(c) eligibility requirements for the refund; and
(d) how to distribute the refunds.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 15, and the provisions of Title 15 apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on approval by the electorate.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Submission to electorate. [This act] shall be submitted to the qualified
electors of Montana at the general election to be held in November 2026 by printing on the ballot the full title of
[this act] and the following:
[] YES on Legislative Referendum ____.
[] NO on Legislative Referendum ____.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 327

2026
69th Legislature 2025 HB 327.1
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 327